Maine, session 132, LD1483.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Validation and authorization. Notwithstanding any provision of the
Maine Revised Statutes or the charter of the City of South Portland to the contrary, the City
of South Portland referendum conducted on November 5, 2024 with respect to the 2 bond
ordinance questions and the charter amendment question and the proceedings related to
that referendum are validated and made effective. The City of South Portland is authorized
to enter into contracts and to issue bonds or notes of the city in an amount not to exceed
$1,000,000 to finance school maintenance and improvements and $3,000,000 to finance
school safety improvements, all as set forth in the respective bond ordinances. The City of
South Portland's charter is amended to reflect the approved changes as set forth in the
charter amendment question.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2510(03)